test/src/morphology/N-zeett_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - zeeˊtt a-stem vävy: # Noun - full paradigm
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Nom: zeeˊtt
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Gen: zeeˊtt
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Acc: zeeˊtt
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Ill: zeetta
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Loc: zeeˊttest
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Com: zeeˊttin
     zeeˊtt+N+Ess: zeeˊtten
     zeeˊtt+N+Par: zeeˊtted
     zeeˊtt+N+Sg+Abe: zeeˊttʼtää
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Nom: zeeˊtt
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Gen: zeeˊtti
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Acc: zeeˊttid
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Ill: zeeˊttid
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Loc: zeeˊttin
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Com: zeeˊttivuiˊm
     zeeˊtt+N+Pl+Abe: zeeˊttitää
